Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
PENALTIES

§342D-30 Civil penalties. (a) Any
person who violates this chapter, any rule, or any term or condition of a
permit or variance issued pursuant to this chapter shall be fined not more than
$25,000 for each separate offense. Each day of each violation shall constitute
a separate offense. Any action taken in environmental court to impose or
collect the penalty provided for in this section shall be considered a civil
action. In determining the amount of a civil penalty the environmental court
shall consider the seriousness of the violation or violations, the economic
benefit, if any, resulting from the violation, any history of these violations,
any good-faith efforts to comply with the applicable requirements, the economic
impact of the penalty on the violator, and any other matters that justice may
require. It shall be presumed that the violator's economic and financial
conditions allow payment of the penalty, and the burden of proof of the
contrary is on the violator.

(b) Any person who denies, obstructs, or
hampers the entrance or inspection by any duly authorized officer or employee
of the department of any building, place, or vehicle that the officer or
employee is authorized to enter and inspect shall be fined not more than $10,000
for each day of denial, obstruction, or hampering. Any action taken in
environmental court to impose or collect the penalty provided for in this
subsection shall be considered a civil action. [L 1989, c 212, pt of §2; am L
1991, c 157, §12; am L 1995, c 180, §12; am L 1997, c 147, §2; am L 1999, c
193, §8; am L 2014, c 218, §8]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next